Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 2 State License Requirements and Regulations for Distribution and Sale

Cross references.

Occupational taxes generally, T. 48, C. 13.

3-6-20.
Levy and amount of state occupational tax; application for license.

An annual occupational license tax is imposed upon each winery, manufacturer, broker, importer, wholesaler, and retail dealer of wine in this state, as follows:

Upon each winery and manufacturer $ 1,000.00 (2) Upon each wholesale dealer 500.00 (3) Upon each importer 500.00 (4) Upon each broker 50.00 (5) Upon each retail dealer 50.00 (6) Upon each special event use permit applicant 50.00

Click to view

An annual occupational license tax shall be paid for each place of business operated. An application for the applicable license required pursuant to this title along with the payment of the tax required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be submitted to the department immediately upon assuming control of the place of business and annually thereafter for so long as the business is operated.

History.

Code 1933, § 58-804, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-5501, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 827, § 6/HB 1066.

3-6-21.
Filing of bonds by applicants for licenses generally; waiver of bond requirement.

All applicants for licenses other than retail licenses shall file with the commissioner, along with each initial application, a bond:

Conditioned to pay all sums which may become due by the applicant to the state as taxes, license fees, or otherwise, arising out of the operation of the business for which licensure is sought; and

Conditioned to pay all penalties which may be imposed upon the applicant for failure to comply with the laws and rules and regulations pertaining to wines.

The surety for the bonds shall be a surety company licensed to do business in this state, and the bonds shall be in such form as may be required by the commissioner and may be for a term of up to five calendar years.

The bonds required pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be in the amount of $5,000.00.

All applicants for annual renewal of licenses other than retail licenses must file an annual bond or have a multiyear bond on file with the department that extends at least through the end of the calendar year for which renewal is sought. Such bonds must meet the same conditions as those filed with the initial application.

History.

Code 1933, § 58-807, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-5502, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 49; Ga. L. 2006, p. 206, § 10/HB 1248.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, a period was added at the end of subsection (b).

3-6-21.1.
Licensing of farm wineries to engage in retail and wholesale sales; surety bond; excise taxes.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Farm winery” means a winery which makes at least 40 percent of its annual production from agricultural produce grown in the state where the winery is located and:

Is located on premises, a substantial portion of which is used for agricultural purposes, including the cultivation of grapes, berries, or fruits to be utilized in the manufacture or production of wine by the winery; or

Is owned and operated by persons who are engaged in the production of a substantial portion of the agricultural produce used in its annual production.

For purposes of this paragraph, the commissioner shall determine what is a substantial portion of such winery premises or agricultural produce.

“Georgia farm winery” means a farm winery which is licensed by the commissioner to manufacture wine in Georgia.

“Tasting room” means an outlet for the promotion of a farm winery’s wine by providing samples of such wine to the public and for the sale of such wine at retail for consumption on the premises and for sale in closed packages for consumption off the premises. Samples of wine can be given free of charge or for a fee.

The commissioner may authorize any Georgia farm winery to offer wine samples and to make retail sales of its wine and the wine of any other Georgia farm winery in tasting rooms at the winery and at five additional locations in this state for consumption on the premises and in closed packages for consumption off the premises; provided, however, that notwithstanding any other provisions of this title to the contrary, if the licensee is also issued a license pursuant to Code Section 3-4-24, the commissioner shall not authorize more than one tasting room for such Georgia farm winery and shall require that such tasting room shall be located on the licensed premises of the Georgia farm winery; and provided, further, that the Georgia farm winery shall not sell its wine or the wine of any other farm winery in more than one tasting room, and such tasting room shall be located on the licensed premises of the Georgia farm winery. For purposes of this subsection, the term “licensed premises” shall mean the premises for which the farm winery license is issued or property located contiguous to the farm winery and owned by the farm winery.

The commissioner may authorize any licensee which is a farm winery to sell up to 24,000 gallons per calendar year of its wine at wholesale within the state; provided, however, that the commissioner shall not authorize any licensed farm winery to sell its wine at wholesale unless such licensed farm winery shall have first offered its products for sale at a fair market wholesale price to a licensed Georgia wholesaler and such wholesaler does not accept the farm winery’s product within 30 days of such offer.

A farm winery licensee shall also be authorized to sell, deliver, or ship its wine in bulk or in bottles, whether labeled or unlabeled, in accordance with regulations of the commissioner, to Georgia farm winery licensees and shall be authorized to acquire and receive deliveries and shipments of such wine made by Georgia farm winery licensees.

A Georgia farm winery licensee shall be authorized, in accordance with regulations of the commissioner, to acquire and receive deliveries and shipments of wine in bulk from out-of-state producers and shippers in an amount not to exceed 40 percent of its annual production, provided that the Georgia farm winery licensee receiving any such shipment or shipments files timely reports with the commissioner and keeps such records of the receipt of such shipment or shipments as may be required by the commissioner.

Any wine received in bulk pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection shall have levied thereon the requisite taxes as prescribed by Code Section 3-6-50, and such taxes shall be reported and remitted to the commissioner as provided in Code Section 3-2-6.

The annual license tax for each license issued pursuant to this Code section shall be $50.00.

The surety bond required as a condition upon issuance of a license pursuant to this Code section shall be the same as that required pursuant to Code Section 3-6-21 with respect to wineries.

Wines sold at retail by a manufacturer as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section shall have levied thereon an excise tax as prescribed by Code Section 3-6-50, and such tax shall be reported and remitted to the commissioner as provided in Code Section 3-2-6.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-5511, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 52; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1111, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1116, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1142, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1403, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1026, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 773, § 1/HB 393; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 3/SB 46; Ga. L. 2014, p. 214, § 2/HB 825; Ga. L. 2017, p. 770, § 1/SB 226.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, substituted “40 percent” for “20 percent” in the middle of paragraph (c)(3); and substituted “paragraph 3” for “paragraph(3)” near the beginning of paragraph (c)(4).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2017,
“paragraph (3)” was substituted for “paragraph 3” in paragraph (c)(4).

3-6-21.2.
Sunday sales on farm wineries; off-site sales; sales in “special entertainment districts.”

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title to the contrary, in all counties in which the sale of wine is lawful by a farm winery and in all municipalities in which the sale of wine is lawful by a farm winery, a farm winery which is licensed to sell its wine in a tasting room or other licensed farm winery facility within the county or municipality, as the case may be, for consumption on the premises or in closed packages for consumption off the premises shall be authorized to sell its wine and the wine of any other Georgia farm winery licensee on Sundays from 12:30 P.M. until 12:00 Midnight in a tasting room or other licensed farm winery facility, to the same extent as its county or municipal license would otherwise permit; provided, however, that if such sales of wine on Sundays are lawful at a time earlier than 12:30 P.M. within the county or municipality in which the licensed premises of the Georgia farm winery is located, the Georgia farm winery shall be authorized to sell its wine and the wine of any other Georgia farm winery licensee beginning at such earlier time. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to authorize a farm winery to sell wine as provided in this Code section on any other premises which are not actually located on the property where such farm wine is produced, except in special entertainment districts designated by the local governing authority of the county or municipality, as applicable.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-6-21.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 222, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1164, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1514, § 1B; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1026, § 1; Ga. L. 2018, p. 896, § 2/SB 17.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, in the first sentence of this Code section, substituted “a tasting” for “the tasting”, and added the proviso.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “license” was substituted for “licenses” near the end of the first sentence.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2018).

3-6-21.3.
Sale by farm wineries of wines, distilled spirits, and malt beverages on or contiguous to its own premises.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Affiliate” means any person controlling, controlled by, or under common control with a farm winery.

“Farm winery” means a farm winery as defined in Code Section 3-6-21.1 that is located in Georgia.

“Tasting room” has the meaning provided by Code Section 3-6-21.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title to the contrary, in all counties or municipalities in which the sale of wine is lawful, the commissioner may authorize any farm winery licensee to sell its wine and the wine of any other farm winery licensee for consumption on the premises at facilities located on the premises of the winery or on property located contiguous to the winery and owned by the winery or by an affiliate of the winery.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title to the contrary, in all counties or municipalities in which the sale of distilled spirits, malt beverages, and wines is lawful, the commissioner further may authorize such licensee to make sales of distilled spirits, malt beverages, and wines not produced by a farm winery for consumption in its tasting rooms and at facilities located on the premises of the winery or on property located contiguous to the winery and owned by the winery or by an affiliate of the winery, provided that any alcoholic beverages sold pursuant to this paragraph shall be purchased by the winery from a licensed wholesaler at wholesale prices.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-6-21.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 397, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1026, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 773, § 2/HB 393.

3-6-21.4.
Routes and signage for the Georgia Wine Highway.

The Department of Community Affairs and the Department of Transportation shall, with due consideration to the farm wineries in Georgia, collaborate to designate appropriate routes and signage for the Georgia Wine Highway.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-6-21.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1026, § 1.

Cross references.

Traffic signs, signals, and markings, T. 40, Ch. 6, A. 2.

3-6-21.5.
Production of fortified wine.

A winery may purchase distilled spirits directly from a manufacturer of distilled spirits and blend with wine manufactured by the winery to produce fortified wine. Such distilled spirits shall not be used by the winery for any other purpose or used to create any other type of alcoholic beverage or product.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-6-21.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 366, § 3/SB 286.

3-6-22.
Requirement of license for shipment of wines into state; contents of application; accompanying documents and labels; approval of wholesalers and wholesalers’ territories by commissioner.

No shipper shall be permitted to ship wines into this state without first obtaining a proper license from the commissioner in the manner provided in this article.

In addition to the bond required in Code Section 3-6-21 and such other documentation required by the commissioner pursuant to this title, each shipper shall:

Submit with his application one label for each brand of wine to be shipped for the first time by the shipper into this state;

Designate in the application for registration the sales territories for each of its brands sold in this state; and

Name one licensed wholesaler in each territory who shall be the exclusive distributor of the brand within the territory.

Designations of wholesalers and wholesalers’ territories as provided in this Code section shall be initially approved by the commissioner and shall not be changed or initially disapproved except for cause. The commissioner shall determine cause after a hearing under regulations promulgated by the commissioner for such purposes.

History.

Code 1933, § 58-809, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-5503, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note and comment,
“Dude, Where’s My Wine? The
Potential Effect of Granholm
v. Heald on Georgia Direct
Wine Shipment Regulations,”
see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 631 (2007).

3-6-23.
Persons to whom wine may be sold by wholesale dealers.

Except as provided in paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 3-2-13, licensed wholesale dealers shall sell wine only to other licensed wholesale dealers and to importers and retail dealers licensed in this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 58-821, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-5507, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 50; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 3.

3-6-24.
Preparation and retention of invoices of sales by wholesale dealers.

Each wholesale dealer, at the time of any sale of wine, shall prepare and keep a copy of a sales invoice containing:

The name of the wholesale dealer;

The name, address, and license number of the licensed importer, wholesaler, or retailer making the purchase;

The quantity and container sizes of wine sold;

The date of the sale; and

Any other information the commissioner may require.

History.

Code 1933, § 58-820, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-5506, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-6-25.
Wine acquired by retail dealers from persons other than licensed wholesale dealers declared contraband.

Except as provided in Code Sections 3-6-21.1 through 3-6-21.3 and Code Section 3-6-21.5, wine possessed, sold, or offered for sale by a retail dealer which was purchased or otherwise acquired from any person other than a wholesale dealer authorized to do business under this chapter is declared to be contraband and shall be seized and disposed of by the commissioner in the manner provided in this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 58-815, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-5504, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 366, § 4/SB 286.

3-6-25.1.
Display of advertisement or information regarding prices of wine in visible places; sales below cost prohibited; exceptions authorized.

No person holding a retail dealer’s license to deal in wine by the package shall display any advertisement of or information regarding the price or prices of any wine in any show window or other place visible from outside the licensee’s place of business.

No person licensed to sell wine by the package for carry-out purposes shall sell such beverages at a price less than the cost which such licensee pays for such wine. As used in this subsection, cost shall include the wholesale price plus the local excise tax imposed, as reflected in invoices which the commissioner of revenue may require to be maintained on said licensee’s place of business.

The commissioner of revenue shall be authorized to adopt such regulations as he or she deems necessary to provide for exception to the prohibition provided in subsection (b) of this Code section for reasons relating to liquidation of inventory, close-out of brands, outdated products, or any other reason the commissioner may determine to merit an exception.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-6-25.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 785, § 2.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 785, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

3-6-26.
Delivery, transportation, receipt, and storage of wine sold by wholesale dealers to retail dealers.

All wines sold by a wholesale dealer to a retail dealer shall be delivered only to the premises of a licensed retail dealer and transported only by a conveyance owned, or leased, and operated by a wholesale dealer, or owned, or leased, and operated by a wholesale dealer’s employee, who is designated to deal in the brands of wines sold and is licensed to make sales and deliveries within the municipality or county in which the sale or delivery is made.
The wine so sold shall not be delivered to, received, or stored at any place other than premises for which state and local retail licenses have been issued.

History.

Code 1933, § 58-819, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-5505, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 83, § 2.

3-6-26.1.
Requirement as to possession of invoices or delivery tickets when transporting wine upon which taxes not paid; seizure as contraband when transported without invoices or delivery tickets.

Every person who transports wine, upon which the taxes imposed by this title have not been paid, into or out of or within this state shall have in his actual personal possession invoices or delivery tickets showing the name and address of the seller or consignor, the name and address of the purchaser or consignee, the quantity of wine being transported, and the name and address of the person responsible for payment of the state tax at the ultimate destination.

All wines, and the vehicles in which the wines are being transported, which are transported into or out of or within this state without accompanying invoices or delivery tickets are declared to be contraband and shall be seized by the commissioner or his agents. The seizure, disposition, and any claims shall be handled pursuant to Code Section 3-2-35.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-5510, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 51.

3-6-27.
Registration of agents, representatives, salesmen, and employees of manufacturers, importers, producers, or brokers.

Every agent, representative, salesman, and employee of each winery, manufacturer, importer, producer, or broker shipping, or causing to be shipped, wines into the state shall register with the commissioner on forms prepared by the commissioner before engaging in the selling, promoting, displaying, or advertising of wine.

History.

Code 1933, § 58-823, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-5508, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-6-28.
Wine to be in containers specified; standards of fill for wine; exemptions from requirements as to container size.

All wine shipped into this state and all wine manufactured within this state shall be in containers specified in the Standards of Fill for Wine prescribed by the United States Department of the Treasury for wines shipped in interstate commerce. The federal regulations relating to Standards of Fill for Wine are adopted and incorporated by reference in this Code section. Wines manufactured and produced in this state shall be exempt from this Code section, provided the container sizes were in use and exempt from such federal regulations on January 1, 1977.

History.

Code 1933, § 58-824, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-5509, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

Code of Federal Regulations. —

As to Standards of Fill for Wine, see
27 CFR § 4.70 et seq.

3-6-29.
[Reserved] Content requirements for wines manufactured by domestic and farm wineries; rules and regulations.

History.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 979, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 3; repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 773, § 3/HB 393, effective July 1, 2008.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 773, § 3/HB 393 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2008.

3-6-30.
Creation of limited exceptions regarding direct shipments.

The General Assembly reaffirms the findings, determinations, and declarations in Code Section 3-3-31 regarding direct shipments of alcoholic beverages, but creates limited exceptions set forth in Code Sections 3-6-31 and 3-6-32 to permit the direct shipment of wine to residents of this state under certain circumstances.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-6-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1401, § 2.

Cross references.

Legislative findings, §

3-3-31

.

Law reviews.

For note on 2000 enactment of O.C.G.A. §§

3-6-30

to

3-6-32

, see 17 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 7 (2000).

For note and comment,
“Dude, Where’s My Wine? The
Potential Effect of Granholm
v. Heald on Georgia Direct
Wine Shipment Regulations,”
see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 631 (2007).

3-6-31.
Special order shipping license requirements and regulations.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “winery” means any maker or producer of wine whether in this state or in any other state, who holds a valid federal basic wine manufacturing permit.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title to the contrary, any shipper which is also a winery may be authorized to make direct shipments of wine to consumers in this state, without complying with the provisions of Code Section 3-6-22, upon obtaining a special order shipping license from the commissioner pursuant to this Code section.

A special order shipping license shall only be issued to a winery upon compliance with all applicable provisions of this title and the regulations promulgated pursuant to this title, and upon payment of the license fee designated for retail dealers in Code Section 3-6-20.

A special order shipping license shall entitle the winery to ship wine upon order directly to consumers for personal or household use in this state without designating wholesalers as required by Code Section 3-6-22, provided that:

The holder of a special order shipping license shall only ship brands of wine for which the holder has submitted labels to the commissioner;

No holder of a special order shipping license shall be permitted to ship in excess of 12 standard cases of wine of one brand or a combination of brands into this state to any one consumer or address per calendar year;

Before accepting an order from a consumer in this state, the holder of a special order shipping license shall require that the person placing the order state affirmatively that he or she is of the age required by Code Section 3-3-23 and shall verify the age of such person placing the order either by the physical examination of an approved government issued form of identification or by utilizing an Internet based age and identification service;

A special order shipping license shall not authorize the shipment of any wine to any premises licensed to sell alcoholic beverages pursuant to this title; and

Every shipment of wine by the holder of a special order shipping license shall be clearly marked “Alcoholic Beverages, Adult Signature Required,” and the carrier delivering such shipment shall be responsible for obtaining the signature of an adult who is at least 21 years of age as a condition of delivery.

The failure to comply strictly with the requirements of this Code section, Code Section 3-3-23, and all applicable provisions of this title and regulations promulgated pursuant to this title shall be grounds for the revocation of a special order shipping license or other disciplinary action by the commissioner. Upon revocation of a special order shipping license for shipment of wine to a person not of age as required by Code Section 3-3-23, such winery shall not be issued any special order shipping license pursuant to this Code section for a period of five years from the date of revocation.

The holder of a special order shipping license shall collect all excise taxes imposed by Code Section 3-6-50, shall remit such taxes in the same manner as licensed wine wholesalers, and shall accompany such remittance with such reports, documentation, and other information as may be required by the commissioner. In addition, an applicant for and a holder of a special order shipping license, as a condition of receiving and holding a valid license, shall:

Agree to collect and to pay applicable Georgia state and local sales tax on each sale shipped to a consumer in Georgia;

Accompany each remittance with such sales tax reports, documentation, and other information as may be required by the commissioner; and

Consent to enforcement of the provisions of this Code section by the department and to the jurisdiction of the courts of Georgia for the collection of such taxes or other moneys owing, including interest and penalties.

The commissioner may promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary and appropriate for the enforcement of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-6-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1401, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 376, § 1/HB 1061.

Cross references.

Minimum age for furnishing, purchasing, or possession of alcoholic beverages, §

3-3-23

.

Law reviews.

For note and comment,
“Dude, Where’s My Wine? The
Potential Effect of Granholm
v. Heald on Georgia Direct
Wine Shipment Regulations,”
see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 631 (2007).

3-6-32.
Shipment of wine by winery to consumers; circumstances.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title to the contrary, a winery located within this state or outside this state that holds a federal basic wine manufacturing permit, whether licensed under this title or not and without regard to brand or label registrations or designations of wholesalers pursuant to Code Section 3-6-22, shall be permitted to ship wine directly to consumers in this state for personal or household use under the following circumstances:

The consumer must purchase the wine while physically present on the premises of the winery;

The winery must verify that the consumer purchasing the wine is of the age required by Code Section 3-3-23 and is not licensed pursuant to this title; and

No winery shall ship in excess of five cases of any brand or combination of brands to any one consumer or any one address in this state in any calendar year.

The commissioner may promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary and appropriate for the enforcement of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-6-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1401, § 2.

Cross references.

Minimum age for furnishing, purchasing, or possession of alcoholic beverages, §

3-3-23

.

Law reviews.

For note and comment,
“Dude, Where’s My Wine? The
Potential Effect of Granholm
v. Heald on Georgia Direct
Wine Shipment Regulations,”
see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 631 (2007).